el: Μηχανισμός ανίχνευσης αισθητήρα στάθμης καυσίμου: Χωρητικός; Βραχίονας με φλοτέρ (μοχλός); Αισθητήρας (χωρίς φλοτέρ); Υπερήχων; Κάθετος διακόπτης reed; Άλλο
pl: Mechanizm pomiarowy czujnika poziomu paliwa: Pojemnościowy; Ramię pływaka (dźwignia); Sonda (bez pływaka); Ultradźwiękowy; Pionowy kontaktron; Inny
da: Brændstofniveausensorens målemekanisme: Kapacitiv; Flyderarm (arm); Sonde (ingen flyder); Ultralyd; Lodret reed-kontakt; Andet
tr: Yakıt seviyesi sensörü algılama mekanizması: Kapasitif; Şamandıra kolu (manivela); Prob (şamandırasız); Ultrasonik; Dikey manyetik kontak (reed switch); Diğer
sv: Bränslenivåsensorns avkänningsmekanism: Kapacitiv; Flottörarm (spak); Sond (utan flottör); Ultraljud; Vertikal reed-kontakt; Övrigt
de: Messmechanismus des Kraftstoffstandssensors: Kapazitiv; Schwimmerarm (Hebel); Sonde (ohne Schwimmer); Ultraschall; Vertikaler Reed-Schalter; Sonstige
sk-SK: Mechanizmus snímania snímača hladiny paliva: Kapacitný; Plavákové rameno (páka); Sonda (bez plaváka); Ultrazvukový; Vertikálny jazýčkový spínač; Iné
th: กลไกการตรวจจับเซ็นเซอร์ระดับน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: คาปาซิทีฟ; ก้านลูกลอย; โพรบ (ไม่มีลูกลอย); อัลตราโซนิก; สวิตช์หรีดแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Mekanisme for føler for drivstoffnivå: Kapasitiv; Flottørarm (spak); Sonde (uten flottør); Ultralyd; Vertikal reed-bryter; Annet
nl: Brandstofniveausensor detectiemechanisme: Capacitief; Vlotterarm (hendel); Sonde (zonder vlotter); Ultrasoon; Verticale reed-schakelaar; Anders
en: Fuel level sensor sensing mechanism: Capacitive; Float arm (lever); Probe (no float); Ultrasonic; Vertical reed switch; Other
hu: Üzemanyagszint-érzékelő érzékelő mechanizmus: Kapacitív; Úszókaros (emelő); Szondás (úszó nélkül); Ultrahangos; Függőleges reed-relés; Egyéb
ja: 燃料レベルセンサーの検知メカニズム: 静電容量式; フロートアーム (レバー); プローブ (フロートなし); 超音波式; 垂直リードスイッチ; その他
zh-CN: 油位传感器感应机制: 电容式; 浮臂（杠杆）; 探头式（无浮子）; 超声波; 垂直干簧管开关; 其他
vi: Cơ chế cảm biến mức nhiên liệu: Điện dung; Cần phao (đòn bẩy); Cảm biến đo (không phao); Sóng siêu âm; Công tắc từ thẳng đứng; Khác
pt-PT: mecanismo de deteção do sensor de nível de combustível: Capacitivo; Braço da boia (alavanca); Sonda (sem boia); Ultrassónico; Interruptor reed vertical; Outro
cs: Mechanismus snímání hladiny paliva: Kapacitní; Plovákové rameno (páka); Sonda (bez plováku); Ultrazvukový; Vertikální jazýčkový spínač; Ostatní
pt-BR: Mecanismo de detecção do sensor de nível de combustível: Capacitivo; Braço de boia (alavanca); Sonda (sem boia); Ultrassônico; Chave reed vertical; Outro
it: Meccanismo di rilevamento del sensore di livello del carburante: Capacitivo; Braccio galleggiante (leva); A sonda (senza galleggiante); A ultrasuoni; Interruttore reed verticale; Altro
sl-SI: Mehanizem zaznavanja senzorja ravni goriva: Kapacitivni; Ročica s plovcem; Sonda (brez plovca); Ultrazvočni; Vertikalno reed stikalo; Drugo
zh-TW: 燃油液位感測器感測機制: 電容式; 浮臂 (槓桿); 探針式 (無浮子); 超音波; 垂直磁簧開關; 其他
es: Mecanismo de detección del sensor de nivel de combustible: Capacitivo; Brazo de flotador (palanca); Sonda (sin flotador); Ultrasónico; Interruptor magnético vertical; Otro
ro-RO: Mecanismul de detectare a nivelului de combustibil: Capacitiv; Braț cu plutitor (pârghie); Sondă (fără plutitor); Ultrasunete; Comutator lamelar vertical; Altele
lt-LT: Kuro lygio jutiklio matavimo mechanizmas: Talpinis; Plūdės petys (svirtis); Zondas (be plūdės); Ultragarsinis; Vertikalus herkoninis jungiklis; Kita
ru: Механизм измерения уровня топлива: Емкостной; Поплавок на рычаге; Зонд (без поплавка); Ультразвуковой; Вертикальный геркон; Другое
ko: 연료 레벨 센서 감지 방식: 정전용량형; 플로트 암(레버); 프로브(플로트 없음); 초음파형; 수직 리드 스위치; 기타
bg-BG: Механизъм за отчитане на датчика за ниво на горивото: Капацитивен; Рамо с поплавък (лост); Сонда (без поплавък); Ултразвуков; Вертикален рид ампулен превключвател; Друго
fr: Mécanisme de détection du capteur de niveau de carburant: Capacitif; Bras de flotteur (levier); Sonde (sans flotteur); À ultrasons; Interrupteur Reed vertical; Autre
hr-HR: Mehanizam za detekciju senzora razine goriva: Kapacitivno; Ruka plovka (poluga); Sonda (bez plovka); Ultrazvučno; Okomiti reed prekidač; Ostalo
fi: Polttoaineen tason anturin tunnistusmekanismi: Kapasitiivinen; Kellukevipu (vipu); Anturi (ilman kelluketta); Ultraääni; Pystysuuntainen reed-kytkin; Muu